Oklahoma, session 2025, SB662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 361, O.S.L.
2023 (40 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 904), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 904. The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall have the
following powers, duties, and responsibilities:
1. To administer the provisions of this act the Oklahoma
Workforce Transformation Act or any duty as directed by statute;
2. To establish an office for the Commission within this state;
3. To elect whatever other officers may be necessary to direct
operations of the Commission;
4. To employ or contract for personnel and administrative
support as the Commission deems appropriate to carry out the purpose
and provisions of this act the Oklahoma Workforce Transformation
Act, including, but not limited to, a nonprofit corporation to carry
out the Commission’s objectives, an Executive Director executive
director or other chief executive officer, and any other employees
or contractors the Commission deems appropriate, and to prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation;
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 2

5. To administer the Workforce Coordination Revolving Fund
created in Section 255.4 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. To administer the Oklahoma Workforce Commission Revolving
Fund created in Section 3 of this act;
7. To approve or disapprove the budget of the Commission;
7. 8. To promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this
act the Oklahoma Workforce Transformation Act;
8. 9. To enter into contracts or agreements for studies,
professional services, grant administration and procurement,
research projects, supplies, or any other services the Commission
deems necessary to carry out its purpose, and to incur those
expenses necessary to carry out those purposes;
9. 10. To cooperate with any private, local, state, or national
commission, organization, agency, or group and to make contracts and
agreements for joint programs beneficial to Oklahoma’s workforce
development efforts;
10. 11. To accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts
from any public or private source and deposit such in the Oklahoma
Workforce Coordination Commission Revolving Fund, created in Section
255.4 3 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes this act;
11. 12. To oversee and direct to the extent permitted by law
the activities and administration of the Governor’s Council for
Workforce and Economic Development, including, but not limited to,
the creation and submission of state plans to the federal government
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 3

purs uant to the provisions of the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act;
12. 13. To collect data from federal, state, and local
agencies, departments, educational institutions, boards,
commissions, or any other entities including, but not limited to:
a. number of participants in workforce development
programming,
b. cost per participant,
c. wages before and after participation in programs,
d. degree or certificate conferred on each participant,
e. number of jobs open needing degrees or certificates,
f. labor force and economic information, and
g. any other information the Commission deems appropriate
to guide funding decisions, facilitate its work or the
work of workforce development entities in the state,
or to understand the impact of the state’s workforce
efforts and programming;
13. 14. To create and maintain a public dashboard and create
reports with data concerning workforce development efforts in the
state. All state and local agencies, departments, educational
institutions, boards, commissions, and other public entities shall
cooperate with information and data requests from the Commission or
its designees. It is the intent of the Legislature that the The
Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall serve as the centralized data
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 4

and information repository for workforce development activities for
the state; and
14. 15. To make recommendations to the Legislature to improve
workforce development programs in the state;
16. To implement programs designed to expand workforce
development; and
17. To work with, use and provide data the legislatively
created map developed to help make decisions on economic development
and workforce needs in the state.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 905 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Pursuant to the provisions of Section 904 of Title 40 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, the Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall implement
programs in this state to address the following:
1. Development of a workforce in high demand occupations or
critical occupations as determined by the Oklahoma Workforce
Commission. Actions taken by the Commission may include:
a. identifying the needs of higher education institutions
suited for certain high demand or critical workforce
areas and helping the institutions develop and
implement plans to address those needs,
b. identify outcomes based on funding,

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 5

c. identifying and partnering for scholarship match
opportunities for students interested in these high
demand and critical workforce fields, and
d. helping institutions increase program capacity;
2. Development of work-based learning opportunities, which may
include, but not be limited to, internships, apprenticeships, and
other career exploration and exposure; and
3. Development of innovation within public schools as defined
in Section 1-106 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes that supports
workforce success, which may include:
a. developing enhanced or unique education pathways,
b. utilizing development grants for basic skills
development,
c. utilizing regulatory innovation grants, and
d. assisting in the development of career-connected high
schools.
B. The Commission may administer these programs through funds
in the Oklahoma Workforce Commission Revolving Fund created in
Section 3 of this act.
C. The Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 906 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 6

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Workforce Commission to be designated the "Oklahoma
Workforce Commission Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Commission from
appropriations, donations, grants, and other sources of funding.
All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Commission for
the purpose of duties imposed upon the Commission by law.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025."
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 7

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 662 By: Pugh of the Senate

and

Hill of the House


An Act relating to workforce development; amending
Section 5, Chapter 361, O.S.L. 2023 (40 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 904), which relates to the powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the Oklahoma
Workforce Commission; expanding duties; authorizing
the Commission to implement certain programs to
address certain needs; allowing Commission to utilize
certain funds; providing for promulgation of rules;
updating statutory references; updating statutory
language; providing for codification; and providing
an effective date.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 361, O.S.L.
2023 (40 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 904), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 904. The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall have the
following powers, duties, and responsibilities:
1. To administer the provisions of this act the Oklahoma
Workforce Transformation Act or any duty as directed by statute;
2. To establish an office for the Commission within this state;
3. To elect whatever other officers may be necessary to direct
operations of the Commission;
ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 1

4. To employ or contract for personnel and administrative
support as the Commission deems appropriate to carry out the purpose
and provisions of this act the Oklahoma Workforce Transformation
Act, including, but not limited to, a nonprofit corporation to carry
out the Commission’s objectives, an Executive Director executive
director or other chief executive officer, and any other employees
or contractors the Commission deems appropriate, and to prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation;
5. To administer the Workforce Coordination Revolving Fund
created in Section 255.4 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. To approve or disapprove the budget of the Commission;
7. To promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this act
the Oklahoma Workforce Transformation Act;
8. To enter into contracts or agreements for studies,
professional services, grant administration and procurement,
research projects, supplies, or any other services the Commission
deems necessary to carry out its purpose, and to incur those
expenses necessary to carry out those purposes;
9. To cooperate with any private, local, state, or national
commission, organization, agency, or group and to make contracts and
agreements for joint programs beneficial to Oklahoma’s workforce
development efforts;
10. To accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from
any public or private source and deposit such in the Workforce
ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 2

Coor dination Revolving Fund, created in Section 255.4 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. To oversee and direct to the extent permitted by law the
activities and administration of the Governor’s Council for
Workforce and Economic Development, including, but not limited to,
the creation and submission of state plans to the federal government
pursuant to the provisions of the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act;
12. To collect data from federal, state, and local agencies,
departments, educational institutions, boards, commissions, or any
other entities including, but not limited to:
a. number of participants in workforce development
programming,
b. cost per participant,
c. wages before and after participation in programs,
d. degree or certificate conferred on each participant,
e. number of jobs open needing degrees or certificates,
f. labor force and economic information, and
g. any other information the Commission deems appropriate
to guide funding decisions, facilitate its work or the
work of workforce development entities in the state,
or to understand the impact of the state’s workforce
efforts and programming;

ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 3

13. To create and maintain a public dashboard and create
reports with data concerning workforce development efforts in the
state. All state and local agencies, departments, educational
institutions, boards, commissions, and other public entities shall
cooperate with information and data requests from the Commission or
its designees. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
Oklahoma Workforce Commission serve as the centralized data and
information repository for workforce development activities for the
state; and
14. To make recommendations to the Legislature to improve
workforce development programs in the state; and
15. To implement programs designed to expand workforce
development.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 905 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Pursuant to the provisions of Section 904 of Title 40 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, the Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall implement
programs in this state to address the following:
1. High demand and critical occupation workforce development,
which may:
a. identify the needs of institutions of higher education
suited for certain critical workforce areas,
b. identify outcomes based on funding,
ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 4

c. scholarship match, and
d. improve program capacity development;
2. Work-based learning opportunities, which may include, but
not be limited to, internships, apprenticeships, and other career
exploration and exposure; and
3. K-12 district innovation for workforce success, which may:
a. enhance pathway development,
b. utilize development grants for basic skills
development,
c. utilize regulatory innovation grants, and
d. develop career-connected high schools.
B. The Commission may administer these programs through funds
in the Workforce Coordination Revolving Fund created in Section
255.4 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 662 Page 6